Utah statutes.
48-2e-305.   Limited duties of limited partners.

(1)  A limited partner shall discharge any duties to the limited partnership and the other partners under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights under this chapter or the partnership agreement consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1), a limited partner does not have any duty to the limited partnership or to any other partner solely by reason of acting as a limited partner.

(3)  If a limited partner enters into a transaction with a limited partnership, the limited partner's rights and obligations arising from the transaction are the same as those of a person that is not a partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

